Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.380.030 and 2016 c 188 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The council comprises ((fifteen))22 members appointed by the governor.(2) The governor must create a membership that includes:(a)(i) Representatives of: The department of corrections; the health care authority; the department of social and health services; the employment security department; the juvenile rehabilitation administration; a statewide organization representing community and technical colleges; a statewide organization representing law enforcement interests; a statewide organization representing the interests of crime victims; a statewide organization representing prosecutors; a statewide organization representing public defenders; a statewide or local organization representing businesses and employers; housing providers; and faith-based organizations or communities;(ii) At least two persons with experience reentering the community after incarceration; ((and))(iii) Two other community leaders;(iv) Two community members who are currently incarcerated, one of whom must be incarcerated in a men's correctional facility and one who must be incarcerated in a women's correctional facility; and(v) Two persons who are either a survivor or victim of a crime as defined in RCW 7.69.020, one of whom does not identify as female, and one who does not identify as male.(b) At least one position of the council must be reserved for an invited person with a background in tribal affairs, and such position has all of the same voting and other powers of other members.(3) When making appointments, the governor shall consider:(a) The racial and ethnic background of applicants in order for the membership to reflect the diversity of racial and ethnic backgrounds of all those who are incarcerated in the state;(b) The gender of applicants in order for the membership to reflect the gender diversity of all those who are incarcerated in the state;(c) The geographic location of all applicants in order for the membership to represent the different geographic regions of the state; and(d) The experiences and background of all applicants relating to the incarcerated population.Sec. 2. RCW 43.380.060 and 2016 c 188 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The members of the council ((shall serve without))may receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.220 and 43.03.270, ((but))and are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.Sec. 3. RCW 43.380.070 and 2016 c 188 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Meetings of the council must be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the cochairs or when a majority of the council membership so requests. Members may participate in a meeting of the council by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment as described in RCW 23B.08.200, provided that any member who is currently incarcerated may only attend and participate in council meetings virtually, unless the meeting is held at the correctional facility where the member is incarcerated.(2) ((Seven))Twelve members of the council constitute a quorum.(3) Once operational, the council must convene on a regular schedule at least four times during each year.--- END ---